Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,107.02
Equity securities insider trading; holder or owner of stock; report; filing; violation; effect.

Any person who is the beneficial owner of more than ten percent of the equity securities of any class of a domestic stock insurer and any officer or director of a domestic stock insurer who shall purchase or hold the stock of such insurer shall report such purchase or holding to such domestic stock insurer. Such report shall be filed with such insurer within five days after a person becomes an officer, director or such beneficial owner and not later than the close of the calendar month in which there has been a change in such ownership. Failure of any individual to report such ownership or purchase shall relieve the insurer of the duties prescribed in section 44-3,107 unless the insurer knows or should have known that the purchase was made by an officer, director, or beneficial owner of more than ten percent of the equity securities of the insurer.

Laws 1969, c. 368, § 3, p. 1308.